Massachusetts, session 194th, H4614.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary
and pursuant to the provisions of Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts, and in recognition of the fact that the transfer of right, title
and interest in and to the below-described land by the City of Lawrence will not derogate from or
otherwise impact the protections of Article 97 which limit and restrict the use of said property to
use for open space, conservation and passive recreation purposes, consistent with the provisions
of Massachusetts General Laws, Chapter 40, Section 8C and said Article 97, the City Council
and Conservation Commission of the City of Lawrence are hereby authorized to transfer and
convey by sale or exchange a portion of that certain parcel of City owned park land designated
on the Lawrence Assessors' Map 128 Lot 39, located at the James J. O'Neil Park at the
intersection of Lawrence Street and Chestnut Street-consisting of Seventy-seven (77) square feet,
of 2

more or less, as shown on the Plan of Land dated February 9, 2023 and titled Amesbury Street
Right of Way Plans-Lawrence Property Plans, and in consideration of said transfer, the City shall
be authorized to acquire title to a portion of that certain parcel of land designated as Parcel X
consisting of Three Hundred and Thirty Three (363) square feet, more or less, as more
specifically shown on said Plan by purchase from or exchange with owners thereof for recreation
purposes, consistent with the provisions of Mass. Gen. Laws. Ch. 40, Section &C and Article 97
of the Amendments to the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
SECTION 2. No document or instrument conveying any interest in the subject property
described hereinabove shall be valid unless such document or instrument provides that the
interest in the land designated on Lawrence's Assessors' Map 128 Lot 39, presently located at
Lawrence Street, shall, upon transfer to the City of Lawrence, be held and maintained by the City
solely for open space, conservation and passive recreation purposes, consistent with the
provisions of Massachusetts General Laws, Chapter 40, Section &C and Article 97 of the
Amendments to the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2